csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Imp_m.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: minongwaamookan
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: minongwaamookeg
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: minongwaamookang
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: minongwaangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: minongwaangegon
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: minongwaanziidaa
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: minongwaamin
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [minongwaamog,minongwaamok]
     minongwaam+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: minongwaandaa
